package/tsearch_data/cs_cz.dict
anestetikum/K po:noun
antifašismus/G po:noun
bakterium/K po:noun
barbecue/X po:noun
baseball/C po:noun
bazilika/Z po:noun
blahoslav/NB po:verb
blázince/A po:noun
bohnický/P po:adjective
buddhismus/G po:noun
butterfly/X po:noun
cenovka/Z po:noun
cimbál/C po:noun
citlivost/L po:noun
cucek/O po:noun
cyklokrosař/E po:noun
čaj/F po:noun
čipování/M po:noun
dekorum/K po:noun
derby/X po:noun
designér/B po:noun
dieta/Z po:noun
dílce/A po:noun
diplomový/P po:adjective
dokrývač/F po:noun
doprogramovali/N po:verb
došek/C po:noun
doutníček/O po:noun
drzost/L po:noun
důl/R po:noun
Důl/R po:noun
dům/R po:noun
Dům/R po:noun
duševno/M po:noun
dvůr/R po:noun
Dvůr/R po:noun
egocentrismus/G po:noun
einsteinium/K po:noun
ermitáž/Z po:noun
exlibris/X po:noun
falus/G po:noun
fandovský/P po:adjective
fermium/K po:noun
filištín/B po:noun
filmek/C po:noun
folklorista/A po:noun
goliáš/E po:noun
grave/X po:noun
gymnasium/K po:noun
hermetismus/G po:noun
hit/C po:noun
hledáček/O po:noun
hnětač/F po:noun
hrdlořez/B po:noun
hrubce/A po:noun
hříšnost/L po:noun
hysterický/P po:adjective
chiméra/Z po:noun
chlupáček/O po:noun
indexování/M po:noun
instrumentum/K po:noun
interface/X po:noun
internacionalismus/G po:noun
inulin/C po:noun
ježděn/N po:verb
jírovce/A po:noun
kacíř/E po:noun
kalich/B po:noun
Kbel/D po:noun
kbel/CD po:noun
keříček/O po:noun
klišé/X po:noun
klofáč/F po:noun
klus/CG po:noun
kolektivum/K po:noun
kongesce/Z po:noun
konzistentnost/L po:noun
Kopeček/O po:noun
korporativismus/G po:noun
kostel/D po:noun
Kostel/D po:noun
Kotce/A po:noun
krocan/B po:noun
křepčení/M po:noun
kudrnáč/E po:noun
kůň/R po:noun
Kůň/R po:noun
kus/C po:noun
lakoničtější/P po:adjective
langoš/F po:noun
les/D po:noun
Les/D po:noun
letáček/O po:noun
loz/ND po:verb
lukostřelce/A po:noun
maggi/X po:noun
macha/Z po:noun
martyrium/K po:noun
měšťan/B po:noun
metabolismus/G po:noun
miliardář/E po:noun
mlado/X po:noun
nabíječ/F po:noun
nacismus/G po:noun
nacvakány/N po:verb
nadstandard/C po:noun
nadšence/A po:noun
náklaďáček/O po:noun
naplněnost/L po:noun
narození/M po:noun
nedobrovolný/P po:adjective
nejpozvolnější/P po:adjective
nepřirozenost/L po:noun
nesmyslný/P po:adjective
Nezbavětice/Z po:noun
oblétávány/N po:verb
obraceč/E po:noun
obrněnce/A po:noun
odlišnost/L po:noun
ochlazení/M po:noun
oklesti/N po:verb
ombudsman/B po:noun
omezovač/F po:noun
omnium/K po:noun
oříšek/O po:noun
ozbrojený/P po:adjective
pakůň/R po:noun
pan/D po:noun
pekáček/O po:noun
pekař/NE po:verb
penny/X po:noun
penzista/A po:noun
pergamen/C po:noun
pesimismus/G po:noun
Ples/D po:noun
plotna/Z po:noun
podráždi/N po:verb
pohoštění/M po:noun
polovodič/F po:noun
popel/ND po:verb
portýr/B po:noun
pošetilost/L po:noun
poživatel/E po:noun
prdnete/N po:verb
prémium/K po:noun
promokavý/P po:adjective
předání/M po:noun
překonej/N po:verb
příbytek/C po:noun
připínáček/O po:noun
přípoj/F po:noun
Pyšel/D po:noun
pytluj/N po:verb
rádius/D po:noun
radost/L po:noun
ré/X po:noun
rekurze/Z po:noun
reproduktor/B po:noun
revizionista/A po:noun
rouhač/E po:noun
rozjímání/M po:noun
rožmberský/P po:adjective
sanatorium/K po:noun
scénař/F po:noun
scvrkl/N po:verb
sec/X po:noun
separatismus/G po:noun
sklep/ND po:verb
skřípot/C po:noun
soudržnost/L po:noun
soupeř/NE po:verb
spíkr/B po:noun
spoluautorka/Z po:noun
spolubydlení/M po:noun
stoj/F po:noun
stoleček/O po:noun
stůl/R po:noun
supra/X po:noun
svěžen/N po:verb
synečkův/P po:adjective
šedivce/A po:noun
šlechtitel/E po:noun
telepat/B po:noun
termoplast/C po:noun
thalium/K po:noun
tripartita/Z po:noun
tryskáč/F po:noun
tuctovost/L po:noun
uchazeč/E po:noun
ukazováček/O po:noun
ukojení/M po:noun
uraděn/N po:verb
usus/G po:noun
vádí/X po:noun
vepsaný/P po:adjective
všeuměl/B po:noun
všudypřítomnost/L po:noun
vůl/R po:noun
Vůl/R po:noun
vykořenění/M po:noun
výkres/C po:noun
vytáhnout/N po:verb
vytrvalce/A po:noun
vyvíječ/F po:noun
záhyba/Z po:noun
zamračení/M po:noun
zastavěný/P po:adjective
zfalšuje/N po:verb
zlatodůl/R po:noun
známost/L po:noun
zpoplatnění/M po:noun
zvěrolékař/E po:noun
